Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 7. General Provisions.

Sec. 34.45.700.
Agreement to locate reported property.

An agreement to pay compensation to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of property reported under AS

34.45.280

while in the possession of a holder is unenforceable if made

before the date payment or delivery is made under AS

34.45.320

; or

within 24 months after the date payment or delivery is made under AS

34.45.320

.

An agreement executed after the 24-month period is enforceable only if

the fee or compensation is not more than

20 percent of the value of the property if the value of the property is less than $500; and

10 percent of the value of the property if the value of the property is $500 or more;

the agreement is in writing, signed by the apparent owner, does not exceed six months, and specifies the fees to be charged, nature and value of the property, and the value of the apparent owner’s share after the fee or compensation is deducted.

This section does not preclude an owner from asserting that an agreement to locate property is otherwise invalid.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 9 ch 145 SLA 1996)

Sec. 34.45.710.
Foreign transactions.

AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

do not apply to property held, due, and owing in a foreign country and arising out of a foreign transaction.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.720.
Application; exceptions.

AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

do not relieve a holder of a duty that arose before September 7, 1986 to report, pay, or deliver property. A holder who did not comply with the law in effect before September 7, 1986 is subject to the applicable enforcement and penalty provisions that existed before September 7, 1986, and the applicable enforcement and penalty provisions are continued in effect for the purpose of this subsection.

The initial report filed under AS

34.45.280

for property that was not required to be reported before September 7, 1986 but that is subject to AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

must include all items of property that would have been presumed abandoned during the six-year period preceding September 7, 1986, as if AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

had been in effect during that period.

AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

do not apply to a disbursement for the payment of a permanent fund dividend.

Checks, drafts, currency, and tangible property that are found and turned over to, or found and recovered by, a law enforcement agency of a municipality are not subject to AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

if the municipality has adopted an ordinance providing for the custody and disposition of the property.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 4 SLA 1992; am § 10 ch 129 SLA 1996; am § 16 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.730.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.740.
Uniformity of application and construction.

AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

shall be applied and construed so as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to unclaimed property among states enacting the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.750.
Report by department upon failure to make report or making false report.

If a person fails to submit a report as required under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

, or makes, wilfully or otherwise, a false report, the department shall make the report from the information it obtains under AS

43.05.050

.
A report made by the department is prima facie valid for all legal purposes.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)

Sec. 34.45.760.
Definitions.

In AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

, unless the context requires otherwise,

“apparent owner” means the person whose name appears on the records of the holder as the person entitled to property held, issued, or owing by the holder;

“banking organization” means a bank, trust company, savings bank, industrial bank, land bank, safe deposit company, private banker, or an organization defined by other applicable laws as a bank or banking organization;

“business association” means a nonpublic corporation, joint stock company, investment company, business trust, mutual fund, joint venture, limited liability company, partnership, or association for business purposes or other business entity of one or more individuals, whether or not for profit, including a banking organization, financial organization, insurance company, or utility;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of revenue;

“department” means the Department of Revenue;

“domicile” means the state of incorporation of a corporation and the state of the principal place of business of an unincorporated person;

“financial organization” means a savings and loan association, cooperative bank, building and loan association, or credit union;

“gift certificate” means an obligation of a business association arising from a transaction between the business association and a consumer to provide goods or services at a future date; “gift certificate” includes a gift certificate, stored value card, gift card, on-line gift account, or other representation or evidence of the obligation of a business association;

“holder” means a person, wherever organized or domiciled, who is

in possession of property belonging to another,

a trustee, or

indebted to another on an obligation;

“insurance company” means an association, corporation, fraternal or mutual benefit organization, whether or not for profit, that is engaged in providing insurance coverage, including accidental, burial, casualty, credit life, contract performance, dental, fidelity, fire, health, hospitalization, illness, life, including endowments and annuities, malpractice, marine, mortgage, surety, and wage protection insurance;

“intangible property”

includes

money, checks, drafts, warrants, deposits, interest, dividends, and income;

credit balances, customer overpayments, gift certificates, security deposits, refunds, credit memos, unpaid wages, and unidentified remittances;

stocks and other intangible equity interests in business associations;

money deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, coupons, and other securities, or to make distributions;

amounts due and payable under the terms of insurance policies;

amounts distributable from a trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit-sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment insurance, or similar benefits; and

amounts due and payable as mineral proceeds;

does not include

unused airline tickets;

shares of stock issued by a corporation organized under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) or unclaimed dividends payable on the shares of stock; or

overpaid contributions by employers to the unemployment compensation fund under AS

23.20.130

;

“mineral” means gas; oil; other gaseous, liquid, and solid hydrocarbons; oil shale; cement material; sand and gravel; road material; building stone; chemical raw material; gemstone; fissionable and nonfissionable ores; colloidal and other clay; steam and other geothermal resources; or any other substance defined as mineral by other state law;

“mineral proceeds” means amounts payable for the extraction, production, or sale of minerals, or, upon the abandonment of those payments, all payments that become payable after the abandonment; “mineral proceeds” includes amounts payable

for the acquisition and retention of a mineral lease, including bonuses, royalties, compensatory royalties, shut-in royalties, minimum royalties, and delay rentals;

for the extraction, production, or sale of minerals, including net revenue interests, royalties, overriding royalties, extraction payments, and production payments;

under an agreement or option, including a joint operating agreement, unit agreement, pooling agreement, and farm-out agreement;

“owner” means a depositor in the case of a deposit, a beneficiary in the case of a trust other than a deposit in trust, a creditor, claimant, or payee in the case of other intangible property, or a person having a legal or equitable interest in property subject to AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

; the term includes a person’s legal representative;

“person” means an individual, business association, state, municipality or other government, including the United States government, subdivision or agency, public corporation, public authority, estate, trust, two or more persons having a joint or common interest, or other legal or commercial entity;

“property” means personal property, but does not include property covered by

AS

14.57.200

—

14.57.290

;

AS 23.20;

“state” means a state, district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession, or other area subject to the legislative authority of the United States;

“unsworn falsification” means the offense described in AS

11.56.210

;

“utility” means a person who owns or operates for public use a plant, equipment, property, franchise, or license for the transmission of communications or the production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, steam, or gas.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1988; am § 29 ch 100 SLA 1989; am §§ 10, 11 ch 145 SLA 1996; am § 49 ch 65 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 122 SLA 2000; am §§ 16 — 18 ch 90 SLA 2004; am § 12 ch 130 SLA 2004; am § 42 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Renumbered and reorganized in 1998 and in 2004 to alphabetize the defined terms.

The 2005 amendment has been given effect in paragraph (11), rather than in paragraph (10) as enacted, to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 34.45.780.
Short title.

AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

may be cited as the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)